src/lexica/__backup__/punc.lexc
!!!punc.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Punc

LEXICON Root
Punc;

LEXICON PuncInf
+Punc:0 #;

LEXICON Punc
!Lexical items from corpus
!	PuncInf;
–	PuncInf;
15	PuncInf;
....	PuncInf;
متعدد	PuncInf;
»	PuncInf;
...	PuncInf;
و	PuncInf;
]	PuncInf;
'	PuncInf;
«	PuncInf;
.‬	PuncInf;
،	PuncInf;
....	PuncInf;
؛	PuncInf;
؟	PuncInf;
!	PuncInf;
"	PuncInf;
%	PuncInf;
&	PuncInf;
)	PuncInf;
(	PuncInf;
-	PuncInf;
/	PuncInf;
.	PuncInf;
؟‬	PuncInf;
:	PuncInf;
<	PuncInf;
>	PuncInf;
که	PuncInf;
قتل	PuncInf;
[	PuncInf;
٬	PuncInf;
”	PuncInf;
“	PuncInf;
»	PuncInf;
